Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 7. Operating Railroads

§ 3720.
Repealed. 1995, No. 183 (Adj. Sess.), § 9b, eff. May 22, 1996.

§ 3721.
Badges.

A conductor, baggage master, engineer, brakeman, or other servant of a railroad corporation employed in a passenger train or at stations for passengers shall wear upon his or her hat or cap a badge, which shall indicate his or her office, and the initial letters of the name of the corporation by which he or she is employed. An officer without such badge shall not demand or be entitled to receive from any passenger any fare, toll, or ticket; or interfere with a passenger or his or her baggage or property; or exercise any of the powers of his or her office.

§ 3722.
Baggage checks.

Baggage masters and station agents on railroads shall give checks when requested so to do, to the owners of baggage who hold tickets, when delivered to them for the transportation from station to station. Such checks shall be returned to the baggage master or station agent when he or she delivers the baggage to the owner. A person or corporation operating a railroad whose officers or employees do not comply with the requirements of this section shall be fined $10.00, and shall also be liable for damages which accrue in consequence thereof.

§ 3723.
Ejectment of passenger from train.

When a passenger in a train refuses to pay his or her fare or toll or to comply with the reasonable regulations of the corporation for the government of passengers, or is disorderly or intoxicated, the conductor of the train and the employees of the corporation may put him or her out of the cars at the nearest regular station on such railroad, causing the train to be stopped for that purpose. Conductors, agents, employees, or other officials of a railroad corporation shall not forcibly eject or cause to be ejected or put out of a train any passenger for nonpayment of fare or for being disorderly or intoxicated, except at a regular station on such railroad.

§ 3724.
Liability for damages.

A person or corporation running trains on any railroad in this State and the conductors, agents, employees, or other officers of such railroad shall be responsible for all injury and damage to persons or property arising by reason of noncompliance with or a violation of the requirements of section 3723 of this title, to be recovered in an action on this statute.

§ 3725.
Refusal to pay fare; penalty.

A person entering as a passenger upon a railroad train and refusing to pay his fare shall be fined not more than $20.00 nor less than $2.00.

§ 3726.
Running out of time; penalty.

A conductor, engineer, or other person having the control of an engine or train of cars, who runs such engine or train of cars or allows the same to be run upon a section of railroad, at the time designated for any other engine or train of cars to run upon such section in an opposite direction, without notice and authorization from the conductor, engineer, train dispatcher, or other person having control of the movement of the last mentioned engine or train of cars shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 nor less than $100.00.

§ 3727.
Only company’s engines to be run on road; penalty.

A locomotive, engine, or other power shall not run upon a railroad, except such as belong to and are controlled by the person or corporation owning and managing the road, unless by the consent of such person or corporation. An engineer or other person violating the provisions of this section shall be liable to the person or corporation for the damages thereby sustained, and shall be fined not more than $500.00. If a collision of trains results from the violation of this section, whereby a person is killed, such engineer or other person shall be guilty of manslaughter. This section shall not be enforced when it conflicts with the charter of a railroad corporation organized under the laws of this State.

§ 3728.
Employ of person using alcohol; penalty; damages.

When a railroad corporation employs or retains in its service a conductor, engineer, brakeman, switchman, semaphore operator or other signalman, train dispatcher, or telegraph operator who receives train orders, who uses alcohol as a beverage, such fact being known to the president, superintendent, or any of the directors of such road, such corporation shall be fined not more than $3,000.00 nor less than $300.00. Such corporation shall also be liable for the damages which a person sustains by the employment or retention of such employee.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 83

, § 161(1).

§ 3729.
Use of alcohol by employee; penalty.

A person named in section 3728 of this title who, while in control of the movement of an engine, train, electric car, or semaphore, or while engaged in the discharge of any duty relating to his or her employment, is intoxicated, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(1).

§ 3730.
Negligence of employee; penalty.

An engineer, fireman, or other agent of a railroad who is guilty of negligence or carelessness, whereby an injury is done to a person or corporation, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both. This section shall not exempt a person or corporation from an action for damages.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 3731.
Property held for injuries on road.

When the property or person of another is injured through the default of a person or corporation owning or operating a railroad, or the agents or employees thereof, the cars, engines, and other property which, at the time of such injury, are subject to use in the running and management of such road, and which have, at any time, been owned by such person or corporation, shall be held to be the property of the person or corporation for the purpose of furnishing indemnity for such injury, and may be attached and levied upon as such at the action of the party injured.

§ 3732.
Damages for fire communicated by engine.

A person or corporation owning or operating a railroad shall be responsible in damages for injury to a building or other property caused by fire communicated by a locomotive engine on such road, unless due caution and diligence are used and suitable expedients employed to prevent such injury. The person or corporation shall have an insurable interest in the property along its route, and may procure insurance thereon.

§ 3733.
Repealed. 2007, No. 164 (Adj. Sess.), § 47.

§ 3734.
Trespass on railroad property; penalty.

Definitions. As used in this section:

“Passenger” means a person traveling by train with lawful authority and who does not participate in the train’s operation. The term “passenger” does not include a stowaway.

“Railroad” means any form of nonhighway ground transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic guideways. “Railroad” does not include rapid transit operations in an urban area that are not connected to the general railroad system of transportation.

“Railroad carrier” means a person providing railroad transportation.

“Railroad property” means the following property owned, leased, or operated by a railroad carrier or used in its rail operations:
(4) (A) “Railroad property” means the following property owned, leased, or operated by a railroad carrier or used in its rail operations:

a right-of-way, track, yard, station, shed, or depot;

a train, locomotive, engine, car, work equipment, rolling stock, or safety device; and

a “railroad structure,” which means a bridge, tunnel, viaduct, trestle, culvert, abutment, communication tower, or signal equipment.

“Railroad property” does not include inactive railroad property of the Twin State Railroad.

“Right-of-way” means the track and roadbed owned, leased, or operated by a railroad carrier and property located on either side of the tracks that is readily recognizable to a reasonable person as being railroad property or is reasonably identified as such by fencing or appropriate signs.

“Yard” means a system of parallel tracks, crossovers, and switches where railroad cars are switched and made up into trains, and where railroad cars, locomotives, and other rolling stock are kept when not in use or when awaiting repairs.

Trespassing on railroad property prohibited. Except for the purpose of crossing railroad property at a public highway or other authorized crossing, a person shall not, without lawful authority or the railroad carrier’s written permission, knowingly enter or remain upon railroad property by an act including:

standing, sitting, resting, walking, jogging, or running, or operating a recreational or nonrecreational vehicle, including a bicycle, motorcycle, snowmobile, car, or truck; or

engaging in recreational activity, including bicycling, hiking, camping, or cross-country skiing.

Stowaways prohibited. A person shall not, without lawful authority or the railroad carrier’s written permission, ride on the outside of a train or inside a passenger car, locomotive, or freight car, including a box car, flatbed, or container.

Persons not subject to ticketing. The following is a nonexhaustive list of persons who, for the purposes of this section, are not subject to ticketing for trespass under subsections (b) and (c) of this section:

passengers on trains, or employees of a railroad carrier while engaged in the performance of their official duties;

police officers, firefighters, peace officers, and emergency response personnel, while engaged in the performance of their official duties;

a person going upon railroad property in an emergency to rescue from harm a person or animal such as livestock, pets, or wildlife, or to remove an object that the person reasonably believes to pose an imminent hazard;

a person on the station grounds or in the depot of the railroad carrier as a passenger or for the purpose of transacting lawful business;

a person, or the person’s family or invitee, or the person’s employee or independent contractor going upon a railroad’s right-of-way for the purpose of crossing at a private crossing site approved by the railroad carrier or authorized by law in order to obtain access to land that the person owns, leases, or operates;

a person who has permission from the owner, lessee, or operator of land served by a private crossing site approved by the railroad carrier or authorized by law, to use the crossing for recreational purposes and who enters upon the crossing for such purposes;

a person having written permission from the railroad carrier to go upon the railroad property in question;

representatives of the Transportation Board or Agency of Transportation while engaged in the performance of their official duties;

representatives of the Federal Railroad Administration while engaged in the performance of their official duties;

representatives of the National Transportation Safety Board while engaged in the performance of their official duties; or

a person who enters or remains in a railroad right-of-way, but not within a rail yard or on a railroad structure, while lawfully engaged in hunting, fishing, or trapping; however, a person shall not be exempt from ticketing under this subdivision if he or she enters within an area extending eight feet outward from either side of the rail and within the rail unless he or she crosses and leaves this area quickly, safely, and at an angle of approximately 90 degrees to the direction of the rail.

Rights, duties unaffected. Nothing in this section is intended to modify the rights, duties, liabilities, or defenses available to any person under any other law or under a license or agreement.

Penalty. A violation of this section is a traffic violation as defined in 23 V.S.A. chapter 24 and an action under this section shall be brought in accordance with 4 V.S.A. chapter 29. A person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 3735.
Repealed. 2015, No. 158 (Adj. Sess.), § 16.